Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Quality Child Care

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 4 (a) appropriates seven million three hundred eighty-one thousand four hundred seventy-three dollars ($7,381,473.00) from the general fund to the department of workforce services for the purposes of the act, with the proviso under subsection (c) that of the general fund appropriation in subsection (a) six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) shall only be expended after further legislative action by the 59th Legislature, and also that the department shall not enter into any contract obligating any of these funds under W.S

14-4-201

, 14-4-203,

14-4-204

or

14-4-205

created by the act without future legislative action.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 5, makes the act generally effective July 1, 2006.

Annual Report. —

Laws 2006, Ch. 64, § 3 provides:

The department of family services shall report annually to the joint education interim committee, the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee by October 1 and to the oversight committee created in Section 2 of this act quarterly. The report shall include:

The department's progress in establishing the system under this act;

The participating child care facilities and their ratings;

Information that demonstrates the impacts of the services provided by the system on children, families and communities and how the department plans to measure these impacts;

Public awareness activities;

The collaborative efforts of the departments of education, family services, health, workforce services and others to provide comprehensive early childhood development and preschool experiences for children while meeting the needs of Wyoming's workforce and economic development;

System expenditures of public and private funds; and

Recommendations for changes in the system's operation.

Legislative Oversight Committee. —

Laws 2006, Ch. 64, § 2 provides:

There is created a legislative oversight committee to oversee the progress of the department on implementing the provisions of this act. The committee shall consist of:

Four (4) members of the joint appropriations committee. The members shall be appointed by the cochairmen of the joint appropriations committee, who shall also appoint a co-chairman of the committee;

Four (4) members of the joint labor, health and social services interim committee. The members shall be appointed by the co-chairmen of the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, who shall also appoint a co-chairman of the committee.

The oversight committee shall provide oversight of the department's work toward implementing the quality child care program provided under this act.

The oversight committee shall meet at least quarterly to receive progress reports from the department and consider future legislation necessary to facilitate speedy implementation of the quality child care program provided under this act. The department shall recommend to the committee specific and readily calculable formulae for expenditures under this act, including but not limited to the monthly quality incentive payments to eligible quality child care facilities.

The oversight committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor, health and human services interim committee no later than November 15, 2006.

There is appropriated to the legislative service office sixteen thousand dollars ($16,000.00) for funding the oversight committee under this section for the period from April 1, 2006 through June 30, 2007.

§ 14-4-201.
Quality child care system established.

A quality child care system is created for the purpose of assisting the working families of the state by encouraging the availability of high quality care for children in licensed child caring facilities. The system may consist of:

A quality rating system;

Incentive payments for higher levels of quality care;

Grants for professional educational development;

Technical assistance, business management services and family strengthening programs.

The quality child care system shall also provide for a parental education and public awareness program.

The department of workforce services is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of implementing all or any portion of this article. All rules and regulations shall be promulgated in consultation with the department of education, the department of family services, the department of health, University of Wyoming and early childhood specialists from the private sector.

The state’s responsibility for payments under this article shall be limited to the amount of funding provided for the quality child care system by the legislature. The department may receive donations from foundations or other private sources. Any such funds received shall be deposited into a separate account and are continuously appropriated to the department, which may distribute those funds in accordance with the provisions of this article. Services eligible to be paid for by another public program shall not be reimbursed under this article.

Infants and preschool children served under this article who qualify for disability services shall receive those services through a regional developmental preschool that is supported by state funding for this purpose, provided the parents or caretakers agree to those services. The cost of these services shall not be reimbursed by payments made to providers under this article.

In the delivery of services, facilities that receive funds under this article shall not discriminate against any individual on the basis of sex, color, race, religion, national origin, disability or age other than the age of the qualifying child. Notwithstanding this subsection, facilities shall retain the ability to refer children with developmental disabilities to appropriate services.

Upon approval of the application for funds as provided in this article, the facility shall enter into a contract with the state, wherein the facility shall agree:

To provide child care services in this state for a minimum of one (1) year;

To serve children from families eligible for support for child care under programs, other than the program created by this article, managed by the department of family services;

To submit the reports required by W.S. 14-4-203(d) and to submit information as required in the department’s rules and regulations; and

To immediately repay all funds provided to the facility pursuant to this article, attorney fees and costs incurred in collection, if the facility breaches the contract during the one (1) year period.

The department of workforce services shall structure its contracts with facilities to ensure necessary data is reported uniformly. The contracts shall specify what services will be provided under the contract and the outcome measures to be achieved to allow the department to determine compliance with contract provisions, the services provided, the outcomes achieved and to determine the extent of statewide needs based on the reports received.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 3.

The department, in rating facilities for quality and making payments to facilities pursuant to this article, shall not discriminate against any facility due to religious orientation, affiliation or instruction or the lack thereof. No state funds shall be used for materials for religious instruction, salaries and benefits for staff primarily engaged in religious instruction, or for any other incremental cost of religious instruction or observances. Any facility receiving state funds shall be prepared to demonstrate, if audited, that sufficient nongovernmental funds were available to cover all expenses of religious instruction or observance.

For purposes of this article:

“Department” means the department of workforce services;

“Facility” means child caring facility as defined in W.S. 14-4-101(a)(vi)(D) and (K);

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 3.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3.

Cross References. —

As to Child Care Facilities Act, see §

14-4-101

et seq. As to Child Protection Act, see §

14-3-401

et seq.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), substituted “assisting the working families of the state by encouraging the availability of high quality care for children” for “supplementing high quality care to children,” and substituted “The system may consist” for “consisting” in the last sentence of the introductory language, substituted “Grants for professional-educational” for “Scholarships for professional-educational” in (iii), substituted “business management services and family strengthening programs” for “and quality support” in (iv); inserted “all or any portion of” in (c); substituted “children with developmental disabilities to appropriate services” for “developmentally disabled children to regional developmental preschools supported by state funding” in (f); inserted “of family services” in (g)(ii);
repealed former (m)(iii), which read: “Task force” means a joint task force of employees of the department of workforce services and department of family services appointed by the governor”;
repealed former (j), which read: “The task force created pursuant to paragraph (m)(iii) of this section shall develop an outcomes measurement and data infrastructure system for purposes of performance measurement and quality improvement of services provided by facilities under contract with the department to address statewide planning for quality improvement and increased availability of child care facilities”; and made related changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch.157, §§ 1 and 2 state as follows:

“Section 1.

(a) For the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008, one million five hundred fifty-three thousand dollars ($1,553,000.00) of funds remaining from the appropriation made in 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 64, Section 4 for the purpose of funding a quality child care program pursuant to W.S.

14-4-201

et seq., is hereby reappropriated to the department of workforce services for the following purposes:

Educational grants pursuant to W.S. 14-4-204(a) – three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00);

Continuing education training grants pursuant to W.S. 14-4-204(c) – three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00);

Business management services pursuant to W.S. 14-4-205(b) – one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

Parent education and public awareness programs pursuant to W.S.

14-4-206

– five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00);

Technical assistance pursuant to W.S. 14-4-205(b) – one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

Family strengthening programs pursuant to W.S. 14-4-205(c) – one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00); and

Administrative costs – one hundred fifty-three thousand dollars ($153,000.00).

Section 2. For the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008, four million five hundred thirty-four thousand three hundred eight dollars ($4,534,308.00) of funds remaining from the appropriation made in 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 64, Section 4 for the purpose of funding a quality child care program pursuant to W.S.

14-4-201

et seq., is hereby reappropriated to the department of family services to increase the reimbursement for child care under the Child Care Development Fund 45 C.F.R. 98 to the seventy-fifth percentile of the statewide average market rate and to provide an additional one dollar and forty cents ($1.40) per hour of reimbursement for the care of children less than one (1) year of age and an additional one dollar ($1.00) per hour of reimbursement for care of children one (1) year of age but less than two (2) years of age. All increases apply for qualifying families beginning July 1, 2007.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 5, makes subsections (a), (b), and (c) effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Approved March 21, 2006.

§§ 14-4-202 and 14-4-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 1, related to quality rating system.

§ 14-4-204.
Educational development scholarships and continuing education grants.

The department by rule and regulation shall provide educational development scholarships to assist the owners or staff of child caring facilities to attain certificates or degrees in early childhood development or a related field. Payments under this subsection shall be conditioned upon the recipient of the educational development scholarship entering into a contract to work for a child caring facility in this state for a period as provided in subsection (d) of this section after receiving the certificate or degree.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 3.

A recipient of an educational development scholarship pursuant to this section who breaches the contract required by subsection (a) of this section shall repay that portion of funds provided to the recipient pursuant to this article that is for educational developmental expenses accruing during or after the semester in which the recipient breached the contract, together with attorney fees and costs incurred in collection.

The department by rule and regulation shall provide continuing education grants to child caring facilities to assist the owners or staff of those facilities to obtain continuing education training in early childhood development or related topics. Payments under this subsection shall be conditioned on the following:

The recipient of the continuing education training provided through the grant entering into a contract to work for a child caring facility in this state for a period as provided in subsection (d) of this section after receiving the training; and

An in-cash cost sharing contribution of at least ten percent (10%) from the facility employing the staff member at the time of continuing education training.

The department shall set a formula for duration of contractual commitments under this section through rule and regulation. Commitment duration shall be based on the value of the educational opportunity and shall be commensurate with the magnitude of the grant.

A recipient of a continuing education grant pursuant to this section shall repay all funds provided to the recipient pursuant to the grant, together with attorney fees and costs incurred in collection, if the recipient breaches the contract required by subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

added (c) and (d); rewrote (a) and (b), regarding the purpose and conditions of educational development grants; repealed
former (a)(i) through (a)(ii), regarding the staff member wages and benefits; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), twice substituted references to grants with references to development scholarships; in (a) and (c)(i) substituted “contract” for “written agreement”; rewrote (b); in (c), substituted “continuing education” for “staff development”; and added (e).

§ 14-4-205.
Technical assistance and business management assistance; quality support; family strengthening program.

Quality support payments may be made available to facilities through a competitive process to provide quality care for infants or other children whose care may otherwise be difficult to obtain in the community. Grants shall be awarded as follows:

Repayment shall be required if the facility closes the business within one (1) year after receiving the grant or if the facility fails to comply with any provision of the grant;

Grant requests for increasing capacity shall only be awarded to existing licensed facilities that are at a quality level of three (3) or higher in the quality rating system;

Quality support grants shall not be used for capital construction or purchase of land or buildings;

Grants to any one (1) facility shall not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per child.

The department shall provide technical assistance to facilities on best practices for quality operational improvements and business management services of child caring facilities.

The department of health shall contract for delivery of voluntary family strengthening educational programs to promote family involvement in children’s development.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b), deleted “department of family services and” preceding “department”, deleted “of workforce services” preceding “shall provide technical” and substituted “quality operational improvements and business management services” for “management”; and added (c).

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2007.

§ 14-4-206.
Parental education and public awareness.

The department shall develop and distribute materials to:

Promote knowledge of the quality child care system;

Promote an understanding of the benefits that accrue to children, families and communities from quality child care programs, as based upon the latest findings in research reports and studies;

Promote the advantages of parents personally providing care for their own children whenever possible;

Promote parent involvement in their child’s development and provide information and activities to parents or caretakers to promote early childhood learning and development at home;

Emphasize the importance of parental responsibility and the involvement of the family in quality early childhood development; and

Inform parents about choices available in childcare programs and how to choose an appropriate child caring facility.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 64, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, § 2.

The 2007 amendment

added (a)(vi).

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-4-207.
Reporting requirements.

The department of workforce services shall report annually to the joint education interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1. The report shall include:

The department’s progress in establishing the system under this article;

The participating child caring facilities;

Information that demonstrates the impacts of the services provided by the system on children, families and communities and how the department plans to measure these impacts;

Public awareness activities;

The collaborative efforts of the departments of education, family services, health, workforce services and others to provide comprehensive early childhood development experiences for children while meeting the needs of Wyoming’s workforce and economic development;

System expenditures of public and private funds; and

Recommendations for changes in the system’s operation.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “and” preceding “the joint labor” and deleted “and the joint appropriations interim committee” preceding “by October 1.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 156, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2007.